Hawaii statutes.
[§346-17.5] Federal aid to children in
foster care. (a) Beginning October 1, 1983, not more than forty per
cent of the total number of children for whom maintenance is provided pursuant
to part E of title IV of the Social Security Act may have been in foster care
for more than twenty-four months.

(b) Commencing with the federal fiscal year
beginning October 1, 1984, the department shall reduce by one per cent
each fiscal year the total number of children for whom maintenance is so
provided and who have been in foster care for more than twenty-four months. [L
1982, c 212, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next